Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Part 3

Helicopter Touring

42-1-301. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commercial helicopter touring” means carrying passengers by helicopter, for compensation, from one (1) site for the purpose of aerial observation of landmarks and other manmade or natural sites, touring, sightseeing or amusement or for the purpose of transporting passengers for tourist-related activities and returning the passengers to the original site;

“Primary public airport” means an airport operated by a municipal government, county government or public airport authority and regulated by the federal aviation administration; and

“Tourist resort county” means a county having more than five percent (5%) of its territory located within the boundaries of a national park established pursuant to 16 U.S.C. § 403.

Acts 1991, ch. 212, § 2; 1991, ch. 486, § 2.

Cross-References. Aerial application of pesticides, title 43, ch. 8, part 3.

Aircraft piracy, first degree murder, §39-13-202.

Airport and aircraft security, §39-17-109.

Aviation fuel, §67-6-217.

Aviation fuel, title 67, ch. 4, part 27.

Classification and Assessment if utilities and carriers, title 67, ch. 5, part 13.

Confiscation of aircraft in drug control, title 53, ch. 11, part 2.

Conveyances subject to forfeiture, §40-33-101.

Disorderly conduct, title 39, ch. 17, part 3.

Exemptions from sales and use tax, title 67, ch. 6, part 3.

Goods subject to forfeiture and seizure in drug control, §53-11-451.

Liens against aircraft, title 66, ch. 19, part 3.

Military property, title 58, ch. 1, part 5.

Procedure for seizing contraband alcoholic beverages, §57-9-202.

Procedure for seizing contraband tobacco, §67-4-1021.

Standards for vehicles and equipment, §68-140-307.

State aviation hall of fame, §4-1-326.

Transportation equity fund, commissioners' annual report, §67-6-408.

Transportation equity trust fund, §9-4-207.

Vehicles subject to confiscation transporting alcoholic beverages, §57-9-201.

Attorney General Opinions. Senate Bill 1062/House Bill 1114, 110th Gen. Assem. (2017) would establish state-law requirements related to the inspection, licensure, and operation of motorboats carrying passengers for hire in tourist resort counties, including boats operating on the French Broad River. Certain applications of the inspection and licensure requirements in the proposed legislation would likely be preempted by the comprehensive federal statutory and regulatory scheme governing vessels operating on the navigable waters of the United States. But the restrictions in the draft legislation on the time and manner of the operation of motorboats carrying passengers for hire would not be preempted. The proposed legislation does not violate the equal protection guarantees of the Tennessee Constitution or the U.S. Constitution by treating vessels that carry passengers for hire in tourist resort counties differently than the same vessels in other counties and differently than recreational vehicles in tourist resort counties. OAG 17-45, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 45 (10/9/2017).

42-1-302. Commercial helicopter touring — Permissible locations.

No person shall engage in commercial helicopter touring in any tourist resort county or any municipality within a tourist resort county except at a primary public airport.

Acts 1991, ch. 212, § 3.

42-1-303. Penalty.

A violation of this part constitutes a nuisance and shall be subject to abatement as provided in title 29, chapter 3.

Acts 1991, ch. 212, § 4; 1991, ch. 486, § 3.